Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB904.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the CareerBound Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." As defined in section 103 of the Workforce Development Act."Business partner." A business entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth that employs individuals in a high-priority occupation."CareerBound." The program established in section 3.1234567891011121314151617181920 "Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."High-priority occupation." An occupation that is included in the list issued by the department under section 1302(e) of the Workforce Development Act."Institution of higher education." Includes any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education.(3) The Pennsylvania State University.(4) The University of Pittsburgh.(5) Temple University.(6) Lincoln University.(7) Any other institution that the Commonwealth designates as a State-related institution of higher education.(8) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.(9) Any accredited private or independent college or university."Local workforce development board." As defined in section 103 of the Workforce Development Act."Participating agency." Includes the Department of Education and the Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Pass-through entity." Any of the following:(1) A partnership as defined in section 301(n.0) of the Tax Reform Code.20250HB0904PN0945 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A single-member limited liability company treated as a disregarded entity for Federal income tax purposes.(3) A Pennsylvania S corporation as defined in section 301(n.1) of the Tax Reform Code."Payment." An amount of money paid in consideration for a tax credit under section 7."Program partners." All entities that participate in a school-to-work program."Qualified taxpayer." A business partner or a taxpayer that has been approved for a tax credit under section 7."School partner." A school district, area career and technical school, intermediate unit, charter school or cyber charter school."School-to-work program." A program that has been approved to participate in CareerBound."Soft skills." As follows:(1) The workplace interpersonal and professional skills that are necessary for an employee to adhere to generally accepted workplace behaviors.(2) The term includes work ethic, promptness, integrity and respect for others."Tax liability." An amount of tax due under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX or XV of the Tax Reform Code or under Article XVI of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Tax Reform Code." The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Taxpayer." As follows:(1) A business entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth and subject to taxes imposed under Article III, 20250HB0904PN0945 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX or XV of the Tax Reform Code or a tax under Article XVI of The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(2) The term includes a pass-through entity."Workforce Development Act." The act of December 18, 2001 (P.L.949, No.114), known as the Workforce Development Act.Section 3. CareerBound program.(a) Establishment.--The CareerBound Program is established within the department.(b) Administration.--The department shall administer CareerBound to empower local workforce development boards, school partners and business partners to collaboratively develop and implement innovative school-to-work programs to do all of the following:(1) Provide students with career exploration opportunities and exposure to high-priority occupations to enable each student to make an informed decision on a future career path.(2) Provide local workforce development boards with the funding and support necessary to convene school partners and business partners to implement innovative school-to-work programs.(3) Provide business partners with an opportunity to participate in a tax credit program and to develop collaborative relationships with school partners and local workforce development boards so that the next generation of workers is well-equipped to meet the demand for high-priority occupations.(4) Provide school partners with the funds and framework to deliver to students a relevant and rigorous curriculum that prepares students for high-priority occupations.20250HB0904PN0945 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Provide program partners with informational resources to help them conduct successful school-to-work programs.Section 4. School-to-work program requirements.(a) Curriculum.--The curriculum for a school-to-work program must include one or more of the following components:(1) Early exposure. Curricula approved under this paragraph must provide students with a broad orientation to the tools, processes and procedures used by individuals employed in a high-priority occupation. Activities may include student visits to a business partner's facilities for company tours, demonstrations, field trips and lessons to familiarize students with the basic features of a high-priority occupation.(2) Practical exposure. Curricula approved under this paragraph must provide students with a detailed understanding of the tools, processes and procedures used by individuals employed in a high-priority occupation. Activities may include extended visits by students to a business partner's facilities for demonstrations, job shadowing and hands-on experience with the duties and skills necessary to be employed in a high-priority occupation.(3) Extended exposure. Curricula approved under this paragraph must provide students with an in-depth understanding of the tools, processes and procedures used by individuals employed in a high-priority occupation. Activities may include preapprenticeships, apprenticeships, internships and cooperative learning opportunities to give students practical knowledge that could be directly applicable to a high-priority occupation.20250HB0904PN0945 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Occupational focus.--Curricula approved under subsection (a) must be focused on providing students with exposure to high-priority occupations that are either designated as high-priority occupations Statewide or within the region served by the local workforce development board.(c) Soft skills development.--Curricula approved under subsection (a) must include some instruction on the development of soft skills.Section 5. Application and approval process.(a) Application.--A local workforce development board may submit an application to the department requesting approval for participation in CareerBound.(b) Application requirements.--A completed application must describe the proposed school-to-work program on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. An application must include all of the following:(1) A list of program partners, including a declaration of interest by at least one school partner and at least one business partner. The program partners may include institutions of higher education, nonprofit business-support entities and economic development agencies.(2) A description of proposed curricula, encompassing at least one component listed in section 4(a)(1), (2) and (3).(3) A projection of annual costs associated with the proposed school-to-work program, including:(i) an enumeration of any opportunities to leverage other funding and programming resources; and(ii) a plan for how the school-to-work program will be funded after the first four school years.(4) A list of high-priority occupations that are the 20250HB0904PN0945 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 focus of the proposed school-to-work program.(5) Documentation of any commitment by a business partner that plans to make payment to CareerBound and seeks to utilize the tax credit provisions in section 7, including the amount the business partner has agreed to contribute during each of the first four school years.(6) A start date for the proposed school-to-work program that shall approximately coincide with the beginning of the school year for the school partners.(7) A list of clear objectives and measurable goals that the proposed school-to-work program seeks to achieve.(8) Documentation of an agreement among the program partners describing the role of each program partner within the proposed school-to-work program and the expectations that each program partner agrees to fulfill.(c) Approval process.--(1) The department, in consultation with participating agencies and the board as needed, shall approve school-to-work programs for participation in CareerBound. When determining how many new school-to-work programs to approve annually, the department shall consider the following:(i) Tax credit obligations to business partners for school-to-work programs approved in prior years.(ii) An estimate of the amount of tax credits that will be approved under section 7 over the next four-year period.(iii) An estimate of the amount of financial support from business partners and other sources for proposed school-to-work programs.(2) Priority shall be given to a proposed school-to-work 20250HB0904PN0945 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program demonstrating one or more of the following characteristics:(i) Substantial program integration across educational levels, including use of multiple curriculum components listed in section 4(a).(ii) An ability to leverage other funding and programming resources.(iii) A commitment from a business partner to provide preferred interviews to students completing the school-to-work program.(3) Additional consideration shall be given to a proposed school-to-work program that:(i) includes multiple business partners or multiple school partners;(ii) targets middle school or early high school students for early exposure activities; or(iii) is integrated into a school partner's curriculum as a credit course.(d) Contractual relationship.--Within 30 days of the completion of the approval process, the department shall enter into a contract with each local workforce development board that submitted an application that was approved. The contract shall require the signatories to provide the services described in the approved school-to-work program from funds designated for that purpose in the application or from funds identified by the participating agencies for this purpose under the general appropriation act.(e) Termination.--The department, in consultation with participating agencies and the board as needed, may terminate a school-to-work program for failure to comply with program 20250HB0904PN0945 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements.(f) Expiration of CareerBound Tax Credit support.--A school-to-work program shall not be eligible for support from the CareerBound Tax Credit Program established under section 7 after the end of the fourth school year of operation. The following apply:(1) Beginning with the fifth school year, the school partners and business partners shall assume responsibility for the funding of the school-to-work program.(2) This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a school-to-work program from applying for or accepting Federal or State grant funding or from receiving funding through the local workforce development board, after the expiration of CareerBound tax credit support.Section 6. Operation.(a) Cooperative management.--In collaboration with the participating agencies and the board, the department shall:(1) Manage the operation of CareerBound.(2) Establish an application process.(3) Enumerate outcome-based metrics by which school-to-work programs will be evaluated in the reports under section 8.(4) Institute guidelines and procedures as necessary to implement CareerBound.(b) Informational resources.--In collaboration with the participating agencies and the board, the department shall provide informational resources to help program partners conduct successful school-to-work programs.(c) Availability of tax credits.--The department shall regularly consult with participating agencies to determine the 20250HB0904PN0945 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 availability of tax credits for business partners when determining how many new school-to-work programs to approve.Section 7. CareerBound Tax Credit Program.(a) Establishment.--The CareerBound Tax Credit Program is established to encourage private investment in school-to-work programs approved under section 5.(b) Application and approval of tax credit.--(1) A business partner or a taxpayer that contributes to an approved school-to-work program may apply to the Department of Community and Economic Development for a tax credit under this act. The following apply:(i) The application must be submitted to the Department of Community and Economic Development for the tax credit claimed for payments made in support of an approved school-to-work program.(ii) The application shall be due as follows:(A) A business partner shall:(I) Make an initial application within 60 days of signing the contract under section 5(d).(II) Submit verification of payment no later than March 1 after making a payment in support of an approved school-to-work program during the prior calendar year.(B) A taxpayer that is not a business partner shall apply no later than March 1 after making a payment in support of an approved school-to-work program during the prior calendar year.(iii) The application must be on the form required by the Department of Community and Economic Development, which shall include the following:20250HB0904PN0945 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Information required by the Department of Community and Economic Development to document the amount of a payment made in support of an approved school-to-work program.(B) Information required by the Department of Community and Economic Development to verify that the applicant is a business partner or other taxpayer.(C) The amount that a business partner has contracted to pay in support of an approved school-to-work program for each of the next four years, if applicable.(D) Any other information as the Department of Community and Economic Development deems appropriate.(2) The following apply to review and approval:(i) The Department of Community and Economic Development shall review each application and shall issue an approval or disapproval within 60 days of receipt of the application. The following apply:(A) An approval or disapproval of an initial application by a business partner shall be for each of the years included in the four school years for which the school-to-work program was approved.(B) An approval or disapproval of an application by a qualified taxpayer that is not a business partner or a verification of payment by a business partner shall be for the most recently ended calendar year.(ii) Upon approval of a tax credit for a payment to an approved school-to-work program during the prior calendar year, the Department of Community and Economic 20250HB0904PN0945 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Development shall notify the Department of Revenue to issue a certificate to the qualified taxpayer for a payment that is made during the prior calendar year. The certificate shall state the amount of the tax credit and the procedure for the use of the tax credit awarded under this act.(iii) Subject to paragraph (3)(ii), business partners making payments agreed to in the contract under section 5(d) shall receive preference for tax credits under this section.(3) The following apply to the availability of tax credits:(i) Each fiscal year, the amount of $10,000,000 in tax credits shall be made available by the Department of Community and Economic Development in accordance with this act.(ii) Twenty percent of the total amount of tax credits under subparagraph (i) shall be reserved for qualified taxpayers that are not business partners.(iii) A portion of the total amount of tax credits under subparagraph (i) shall be reserved for approved business partners, based on the information required on the initial application under paragraph (1)(iii)(C).(iv) The amount of a tax credit awarded to a qualified taxpayer under this act shall be as follows:(A) For a qualified taxpayer that is a business partner, the tax credit shall be equal to 90% of the amount of the payment in support of an approved school-to-work program during the prior calendar year.20250HB0904PN0945 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) For a qualified taxpayer that is not a business partner, the tax credit shall be equal to 75% of the amount of the payment in support of an approved school-to-work program during the prior calendar year.(C) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the Department of Community and Economic Development shall not award a qualified taxpayer a total amount of tax credits that exceeds $500,000 in the taxable year for which the tax credit was approved.(c) Use of tax credits.--(1) Prior to sale or assignment of a tax credit under subsection (e), a qualified taxpayer must first use a tax credit against the qualified tax liability incurred in the taxable year for which the tax credit was approved.(2) The tax credit may be applied against up to 50% of the qualified taxpayer's qualified tax liabilities incurred in the taxable year for which the tax credit was approved.(d) Carryover, carryback and refund.--A tax credit may not be carried back, carried forward or used to obtain a refund.(e) Sale or assignment.--(1) If a qualified taxpayer holds a tax credit through the end of the calendar year in which the tax credit was granted, the qualified taxpayer may sell or assign the tax credit, in whole or in part, if the sale is effective by the close of the following calendar year.(2) (i) To sell or assign a tax credit, a qualified taxpayer must file an application for the sale or assignment of the tax credit with the Department of 20250HB0904PN0945 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Community and Economic Development. The application must be on a form required by the Department of Community and Economic Development.(ii) To approve an application, the Department of Community and Economic Development must receive a finding from the Department of Revenue that the applicant has:(A) Filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years.(B) Paid any balance of State tax due as determined by assessment or determination by the Department of Community and Economic Development and not under timely appeal.(iii) Upon approval by the Department of Community and Economic Development, a qualified taxpayer may sell or assign, in whole or in part, a tax credit.(f) Purchasers and assignees.--(1) A purchaser or assignee of a tax credit under subsection (e) must claim the tax credit in the calendar year in which the purchase or assignment is made.(2) The amount of the tax credit that a purchaser or assignee under subsection (e) may use against any one qualified tax liability may not exceed 50% of any of the qualified tax liabilities of the purchaser or assignee for the taxable year.(g) Resale and assignment.--(1) A purchaser under subsection (e) may not sell or assign the purchased tax credit.(2) An assignee under subsection (e) may not sell or assign the assigned tax credit.(h) Notice.--The purchaser or assignee under subsection (e) 20250HB0904PN0945 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall notify the Department of Community and Economic Development of the seller or assignor of the tax credit in compliance with procedures specified by the Department of Community and Economic Development.(i) Pass-through entity.--(1) If a pass-through entity has an unused tax credit, the pass-through entity may elect, in writing, according to procedures established by the Department of Community and Economic Development, to transfer all or a portion of the tax credit to shareholders, members or partners in proportion to the share of the entity's distributive income to which the shareholders, members or partners are entitled.(2) The same unused tax credit may not be claimed by both the pass-through entity and a shareholder, member or partner of the pass-through entity.(3) The amount of the tax credit that a transferee under paragraph (1) may use against any one qualified tax liability may not exceed 20% of any qualified tax liabilities for the taxable year.(4) A transferee under paragraph (1) must claim the tax credit in the calendar year in which the transfer is made.(5) A transferee under paragraph (1) may not sell or assign the tax credit.(j) Administration.--The Department of Community and Economic Development shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this section.Section 8. Annual reports.(a) Requirement.--Within 60 days of the end of each school year in which a school-to-work program is in operation, the department, participating agencies and the board shall jointly 20250HB0904PN0945 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 submit a report regarding the implementation of CareerBound and the school-to-work programs over the previous school year.(b) Contents.--The annual report under subsection (a) must:(1) Include information about each school-to-work program, including whether the school-to-work program achieved the clear objectives and measurable goals proposed under section 5(b)(7), an analysis of the school-to-work program according to the outcome-based metrics enumerated by the department in section 6(a)(3), the number of participating students and the amount spent.(2) Identify best practices observed from among the most successful school-to-work programs.(3) Include the names of the qualified taxpayers utilizing the tax credit as of the date of the report and the amount of tax credits approved for, utilized by or sold or assigned by a qualified taxpayer.(c) Submittal.--The annual report under subsection (a) shall be submitted to:(1) The Governor.(2) The Auditor General.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate.20250HB0904PN0945 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0904PN0945 - 17 - 1234